Tennessee, session 114, SB2192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-916(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the third sentence in the subdivision and substituting:
The amount of the employer contribution must be five percent (5%) of the respective
employee's salary; provided, that, the amount of the employer contribution for a sitting
member of the general assembly on or after November 3, 2026, who has at least ten
(10) years of creditable service in the hybrid plan as a general assembly member, is ten
percent (10%) of the general assembly member's salary.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to members of the general assembly in office on or after November 3, 2026.
SB2192
011936
- 1 -